North Carolina, session 2025, SB952.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 136-189.10 reads as rewritten:
"§ 136-189.10. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
…
(2) Division needs projects. – Includes only the following:
…
e. Public transportation service not included in subdivision (3) or (4) of
this section. This sub-subdivision includes commuter rail, intercity
rail, and light rail. Nothing in this sub-subdivision shall be construed
as authorizing total State funding in excess of the maximum
established in sub-subdivision g. of subdivision (3) of this section for
commuter rail and light rail projects.
…
(3) Regional impact projects. – Includes only the following:
…
g. Public transportation service that spans two or more counties and that
serves more than one municipality. Programmed funds pursuant to this
sub-subdivision shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of any distribution
region allocation. This sub-subdivision includes commuter rail,
intercity rail, and light rail. Total State funding for a commuter rail or
light rail project shall not exceed the lesser of ten percent (10%) of the
distribution region allocation or ten percent (10%) of the estimated
total project costs used during the prioritization scoring process. The
State shall not be responsible or liable for any project costs in excess
of the maximum established under this sub-subdivision. Any
agreement entered into by the State to fund a commuter rail or light
rail project shall include language setting out the limitations set forth
in this sub-subdivision.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 136-189.11(d1) is repealed.
*S952-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the Highway Fund to the Department of
Transportation the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year to be used for safety and security on the CATS Blue Lynx rail line.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 2 Senate Bill 952-First Edition